Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-121
Office supplies; safes; duty to provide.

The county board shall provide and keep in repair, when the finances of the county will permit, suitable fireproof safes for the county clerk and county treasurer. It shall provide suitable books and stationery for the use of the county board, county clerk, county treasurer, county judge, sheriff, clerk of the district court, county school administrator, county surveyor, and county attorney.

Laws 1879, § 25, p. 361;

Laws 1887, c. 27, § 1, p. 353;

Laws 1909, c. 30, § 1, p. 211;

R.S.1913, § 954;

Laws 1915, c. 18, § 1, p. 76;

Laws 1919, c. 66, § 1, p. 176;

Laws 1919, c. 67, § 1, p. 179;

Laws 1921, c. 144, § 1, p. 616;

C.S.1922, § 854;

C.S.1929, § 26-108;

Laws 1935, c. 107, § 7, p. 346;

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 8, p. 149;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-108;

R.S.1943, § 23-121;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 5.

Board is not compelled to let printing contract to lowest bidder. State ex rel. Huse & Son v. Dixon County, 24 Neb. 106, 37 N.W. 936 (1888).